Illinois, session 104th, SB4061.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1063.3 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1063.3 new)7    Sec. 5-1063.3. Building codes; stairs.8    (a) As used in this Section, "building code" means any 9ordinance, resolution, law, housing or building code, or 10zoning ordinance that establishes construction related 11activities applicable to structures in the county.12    (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, no building code adopted by 13a county may prohibit residential buildings from having a 14single stairway serving as an exit for all units if the 15building:16        (1) has not more than 6 stories above grade plane;17        (2) is equipped with an automatic sprinkler system in 18    the interior exit stairway;19        (3) has all dwelling unit doors serving as an exit 20    equipped with self-closing devices;21        (4) is equipped with smoke detection throughout all 22    common areas and individual dwelling units;23        (5) has at least one emergency escape and rescue   SB4061- 2 -LRB104 20885 RTM 34554 b1    opening for each individual dwelling unit; and2        (6) has not more than 4 individual dwelling units on a 3    floor.4    (c) A home rule unit may not regulate buildings in a manner 5inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a limitation 6under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 7Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 8units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 9    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 10adding Section 1-2-3.2 as follows: 11    (65 ILCS 5/1-2-3.2 new)12    Sec. 1-2-3.2. Building codes; stairs.13    (a) As used in this Section, "building code" means any 14ordinance, resolution, law, housing or building code, or 15zoning ordinance that establishes construction related 16activities applicable to structures in the municipality.17    (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, no building code adopted by 18a municipality may prohibit residential buildings from having 19a single stairway serving as an exit for all units if the 20building:21        (1) has not more than 6 stories above grade plane;22        (2) is equipped with an automatic sprinkler system in 23    the interior exit stairway;24        (3) has all dwelling unit doors serving as an exit   SB4061- 3 -LRB104 20885 RTM 34554 b1    equipped with self-closing devices;2        (4) is equipped with smoke detection throughout all 3    common areas and individual dwelling units;4        (5) has at least one emergency escape and rescue 5    opening for each individual dwelling unit; and6        (6) has not more than 4 individual dwelling units on a 7    floor.8    (c) A home rule municipality may not regulate buildings in 9a manner inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a 10limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 11the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 12rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State.